apertium-es.es.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

<alphabet>áÁéÉíÍóÓúÚüÜÑñaAeEiIoOuUyYbBcCdDfFgGhHjJkKlLmMnNpPqQrRsStTvVwWxXzZ</alphabet>

<sdefs>
   <sdef n="n"/>
   <sdef n="sg"/>
   <sdef n="pL"/>
   <sdef n="p1"/>
   <sdef n="p2"/>
   <sdef n="p3"/>   
   <sdef n="vblex"/>
   <sdef n="art"/>
   <sdef n="pri"/>
   <sdef n="prn"/>
   <sdef n="subj"/>
   <sdef n="inf"/>
   <sdef n="for"/>
   <sdef n="m"/>
   <sdef n="f"/>
   <sdef n="mp"/>
   <sdef n="sub"/>
   <sdef n="imp"/> 
   <sdef n="ind"/>
   <sdef n="prt"/>
   <sdef n="fut"/>
   <sdef n="prs"/>
   <sdef n="adp"/>
   <sdef n="con"/> 
   <sdef n="adj"/> 
   <sdef n="adv"/>   
</sdefs>

<pardefs>

	<pardef n="comida__n">
	   <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pL"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>


	<pardef n="__art">
	   <e><p><l>El</l><r>art<s n="art"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>La</l><r>art<s n="art"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>Los</l><r>art<s n="art"/><s n="m"/><s n="pL"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>Las</l><r>art<s n="art"/><s n="f"/><s n="pL"/></r></p></e>

	</pardef>
	<pardef n="prsubj__prn">
	   <e><p><l>yo</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>tú</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	   
	   <e><p><l>él</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ella</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>nosotros</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pL"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ustedes</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pL"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ellos</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pL"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="ar__vblex">
	   <e><p><l>o</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>as</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>a</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prs"/> <s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>amos</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pL"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>an</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pL"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>an</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pL"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="er/ir__vblex">
	   <e><p><l>o</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>es</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>e</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>emos</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pL"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>en</l><r> <s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pL"/><s n="prs"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
	<e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="articles"><i/><par n="__art"/></e>
	<e lm="comida"><i>comida</i><par n="comida__n"/></e>
	<e lm="hombre"><i>hombre</i><par n="comida__n"/></e>
	<e lm="perro"><i>perro</i><par n="comida__n"/></e>
	<e lm="correr"><i>corr</i><par n="er/ir__vblex" /></e>
	<e lm="caminar"><i>camin</i><par n="ar__vblex" /></e>
	
</section>

</dictionary>
